Maryland, session 2026, SB0528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSUMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) “VIDEO PROGRAMMING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 47 U.S.C.
§ 613.
(4) (I) “VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE” MEANS AN ENTITY THAT
TRANSMITS DIRECTLY TO A CONSUMER USING AN INTERNET PROTOCOL–BASED
SYSTEM:
1. VIDEO PROGRAMMING OR VIDEO CONTENT; AND
2. COMMERCIAL ADVERTISEMENTS TRANSMITTED
ALONG WITH THE VIDEO PROGRAMMING OR THE VIDEO CONTENT.
(II) “VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A TELEVISION BROADCAST STATION;
2. A CABLE OPERATOR; OR

SENATE BILL 528 3
3. ANY OTHER TELEVISION MULTICHANNEL VIDEO
PROGRAMMING DISTRIBUTOR;
4. A SERVICE THAT MAKES AVAILABLE PROGRAMMING
OR VIDEO CONTENT WITHOUT COMMERCIAL ADVERTISEMENTS; OR
5. A WEBSITE OR APPLICATION THAT DOES NOT MAKE
VIDEO PROGRAMMING AVAILABLE TO CONSUMERS AS ITS PRIMARY PURPOSE.
(B) A VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE MAY NOT TRANSMIT TO A CONSUMER IN
THE STATE THE AUDIO OF A COMMERCIAL ADVERTISEMENT IN A MANNER THAT IS
LOUDER THAN THE AUDIO OF THE ACCOMPANYING VIDEO PROGRAMMING OR VIDEO
CONTENT BEING TRANSMITTED BY THE VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE.
(C) A VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE SHALL BE CONSIDERED IN COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION IF THE VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE COMPLIES WITH
REGULATIONS THAT ARE ADOPTED:
(1) BY THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION UNDER THE
FEDERAL COMMERCIAL ADVERTISEMENT LOUDNESS MITIGATION ACT; AND
(2) FOR THE PURPOSE OF REGULATING THE AUDIO LOUDNESS OF
COMMERCIAL ADVERTISEMENTS OF TELEVISION BROADCAST STATIONS, CABLE
OPERATORS, AND OTHER TELEVISION PROGRAMMING DISTRIBUTORS.
(D) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT §§ 13–407, 13–408, AND 13–411
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE A PRIVATE
RIGHT OF ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION OR ANY OTHER LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.